Virginia statutes. Title 59.1. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 22.4. Information Technology Employment Performance Grant Program.

§§ 59.1-284.16 through 59.1-284.19.

Repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 13, effective May 4, 2005.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 13, provides: “That notwithstanding the revisions of the first enactment and the second enactment, Chapter 22.4 (§§ 59.1-284.16 through 59.1-284.19) of Title 59.1 of the Code of Virginia is repealed if no specific appropriation
has been made to the Information Technology Employment Performance Grant Program for fiscal year 2004 or fiscal year 2005.” No appropriation was made for fiscal years 2004 and 2005.

Repealed § 59.1-284.17 was amended by Acts 2005, cc. 863 and 884.

Former § 59.1-284.19 was previously repealed by Acts 2004, c. 872, cl. 2.